src/fst/morphology/stems/ojibwe_nouns.lexc
+NAD+Poss+LocDist+3SgObvPoss:iminikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+LocDist+3SgProxPoss:imikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+ObvPl+3PlObvPoss:iminiw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:imiwaa' EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:imiwaan EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+ObvPl+3SgObvPoss:iminiw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:ima' EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:iman EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+ObvSg+3PlObvPoss:iminiw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:imiwaan EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+ObvSg+3SgObvPoss:iminiw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:iman EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+Loc+3PlObvPoss:imishining EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+Loc+3PlProxPoss:imishiwaang EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+Loc+3SgObvPoss:imishining EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+Loc+3SgProxPoss:imishing EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+LocDist+3PlObvPoss:imishinikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+LocDist+3PlProxPoss:imishiwaakaang EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+LocDist+3SgObvPoss:imishinikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+LocDist+3SgProxPoss:imishikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3PlObvPoss:imishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:imishiwaa' EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:imishiwaan EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3SgObvPoss:imishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:imisha' EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:imishan EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+ObvSg+3PlObvPoss:imishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:imishiwaan EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+ObvSg+3SgObvPoss:imishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pej+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:imishan EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3PlObvPoss:iminiban EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:imiwaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:imiwaabanii' EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:imiwaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3SgObvPoss:iminiban EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:imibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:imibanii' EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:imibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3PlObvPoss:iminiban EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:imiwaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:imiwaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3SgObvPoss:iminiban EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:imibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:imibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvPl+3PlObvPoss:iniban EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:iwaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:iwaabanii' EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:iwaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvPl+3SgObvPoss:iniban EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:ibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:ibanii' EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:ibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvSg+3PlObvPoss:iniban EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:iwaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:iwaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvSg+3SgObvPoss:iniban EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:ibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NAD+Pret+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:ibaniin EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NAD, Class: NAD_Vw                                         !
!         Morpheme boundary between stem and suffix                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NAD_Class=NAD_Vw_Boundary
0:%>%> NAD_Class=NAD_Vw_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NAD, Class: NAD_Vw                                         !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NAD_Class=NAD_Vw_Flags
@R.Prefix.G@ NAD_Class=NAD_Vw_Flags_Prefix=G ;
@R.Prefix.N@ NAD_Class=NAD_Vw_Flags_Prefix=N ;
@R.Prefix.W@ NAD_Class=NAD_Vw_Flags_Prefix=W ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NAD, Class: NAD_Vw                                         !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=N                                           !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NAD_Class=NAD_Vw_Flags_Prefix=N
@U.Order.Other@ NAD_Class=NAD_Vw_Prefix=N_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NAD, Class: NAD_Vw, Prefix: N, Order: Other                !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NAD_Stems
gaw:gaw2 NAD_Class=NAD_Vw_Boundary ;
iijiininiw:iijiininiw2 NAD_Class=NAD_Vw_Boundary ;
niijininiw:niijininiw2 NAD_Class=NAD_Vw_Boundary ;
nishi:nishiw2 NAD_Class=NAD_Vw_Boundary ;
nishiw:nishiw2 NAD_Class=NAD_Vw_Boundary ;
